Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 696.010 is amended to read:
696.010. As used in ORS 696.010 to 696.495, 696.600 to 696.785, 696.800  to 696.870, 696.990 and
696.995, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Associated  with” means to be employed, engaged or otherwise supervised by, with respect
to the relationship between:
(a) A real estate broker and a principal real estate broker;
(b) A licensed real estate property manager and a principal real estate broker; or
(c) A licensed real estate property manager and another licensed real estate property manager.
(2) “Bank” includes  any bank or trust company, savings bank, mutual savings bank, savings and
loan association or credit union that maintains a head  office or a branch in this state in the ca-
pacity of a bank or trust company, savings  bank, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association
or credit union.
(3)(a) “Branch office” means a business  location, other than the main office designated under
ORS 696.200, where professional real estate activity is  regularly conducted or that is advertised to
the public as a place where professional real estate activity may be regularly conducted.
(b) Model units or temporary structures used solely for the dissemination  of information and
distribution of lawfully required public reports shall not be considered branch offices. A model  unit
means a permanent residential structure  located in a subdivision or development used for such dis-
semination and distribution, so long as the unit is at all times available  for sale, lease, lease option
or exchange.
(4) “Business day” means a day other than Saturday or Sunday or a federal or State of Oregon
legal holiday.
(5) “Commingle” means the  mixing of funds from any source, including personal funds, with trust
funds as defined in ORS 696.241, by a  licensed real estate property manager or principal real estate
broker, except as specifically authorized by this chapter.
(6) “Compensation” means valuable consideration for services  rendered or to be rendered,
whether contingent or otherwise.
(7) “Competitive market analysis” means a method or process  used by a real estate licensee in
pursuing a listing agreement or in formulating an  offer to acquire real estate in a transaction for
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 1
the sale, lease,  lease-option or exchange of real estate. The objective of competitive market analysis
is a recommended listing, selling or purchase price or a lease or rental consideration.  A competitive
market analysis may be expressed as an opinion of the value  of the real estate in a contemplated
transaction. Competitive market analysis may include but is not limited to  an analysis of market
conditions, public records, past transactions and current listings of real estate.
(8) “Expired” means, in the context of a real estate licensee, that the license has not  been re-
newed in a timely manner, but may still be renewed.
(9) “Inactive” means, in the  context of a real estate licensee, that the licensee is not authorized
to engage in professional real  estate activity. The inactive status of a license continues until the
license is reactivated or the license expires or lapses.
(10) “Lapsed” means, in  the context of a real estate licensee, that the license has not been re-
newed in a timely manner and is not eligible for renewal.
(11) “Letter opinion” has the meaning given that term in ORS 696.294.
(12) “Licensed real estate property manager” means an individual who holds an  active real es-
tate property manager’s license issued under ORS 696.022.
(13) “Main office” means the office designated by  a principal real estate broker or licensed real
estate property manager pursuant to ORS 696.200.
(14) “Management of rental real estate” means:
(a) Representing  the owner of real estate under a property management agreement in the rental
or lease of the real estate and includes but is not limited to:
(A) Advertising the real estate for rent or lease;
(B) Procuring prospective tenants to rent or lease the real estate;
(C) Negotiating with prospective tenants;
(D) Accepting deposits from prospective tenants;
(E) Checking the qualifications and creditworthiness of prospective tenants;
(F) Charging and collecting rent or lease payments;
(G) Representing the owner in inspection or repair of the real estate;
(H) Contracting for repair or remodeling of the real estate;
(I) Holding trust funds or  property received in managing the real estate and accounting to the
owner for the funds or property;
(J) Advising the owner regarding renting or leasing the real estate;
(K) Providing staff and services to accommodate the tax reporting and other financial or ac-
counting needs of the real estate;
(L) Providing copies of records of acts performed on behalf of the owner of the real  estate; and
(M) Offering or attempting to do any of the acts  described in this paragraph for the owner of
the real estate; or
(b) Representing a tenant or prospective tenant when renting or leasing real  estate for which
a real estate property manager has a  property management agreement with the owner of the real
estate and includes but is not limited to:
(A) Consulting with tenants or prospective tenants about renting or leasing real estate;
(B) Assisting prospective tenants in renting or leasing real estate;
(C) Assisting prospective tenants in qualifying for renting or leasing real estate;
(D) Accepting deposits or other funds from prospective tenants for renting or  leasing real estate
and holding the funds in trust for the prospective tenants;
(E) Representing tenants or prospective tenants renting or leasing real estate; and
(F) Offering or attempting to do  any of the acts described in this paragraph for a tenant or
prospective tenant.
(15) “Nonlicensed individual” means an individual:
(a) Who has not obtained a real estate license; or
(b) Whose real estate license is lapsed, expired, inactive, suspended, surrendered or revoked.
(16) “Principal real estate broker” means an individual who holds an active license as a princi-
pal real estate broker issued under ORS 696.022.
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 2
(17) “Professional real estate activity” means any of the following actions, when engaged  in for
another and for compensation or with the intention or in the expectation  or upon the promise of
receiving or collecting compensation, by any person who:
(a) Sells, exchanges, purchases, rents or leases real estate;
(b) Offers to sell, exchange, purchase, rent or lease real estate;
(c) Negotiates, offers, attempts or agrees to negotiate the sale, exchange, purchase,  rental or
leasing of real estate;
(d) Lists, offers, attempts or agrees to list real estate for sale;
(e) Offers, attempts or agrees to perform or provide a competitive market  analysis or letter
opinion, to represent a taxpayer under ORS 305.239 or 309.100 or  to give an opinion in any admin-
istrative or judicial proceeding regarding the value of real estate for taxation,  except when the ac-
tivity is performed by a state certified appraiser or state licensed appraiser;
(f) Auctions, offers, attempts or agrees to auction real estate;
(g) Buys, sells, offers to buy or sell or otherwise deals in options on real estate;
(h) Engages in management of rental real estate;
(i) Purports to be engaged in the  business of buying, selling, exchanging, renting or leasing real
estate;
(j) Assists  or directs in the procuring of prospects, calculated to result in the sale, exchange,
leasing or rental of real estate;
(k) Assists or directs in the negotiation or closing of  any transaction calculated or intended to
result in the sale, exchange, leasing or rental of real estate;
(L) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 696.030 (12), advises, counsels, consults or  analyzes in
connection with real  estate values, sales or dispositions, including dispositions through eminent do-
main procedures;
(m) Advises,  counsels, consults or analyzes in connection with the acquisition or sale of real
estate by an entity if the purpose of the entity is investment in real estate; or
(n) Performs real estate marketing activity as described in ORS 696.600.
(18) “Property management agreement”  means a written contract for the management of rental
real estate between a real estate property manager and the owner of the rental real estate.
(19) “Real estate” includes  leaseholds and licenses to use including, but not limited to, timeshare
estates and timeshare licenses as defined in ORS  94.803, as well as any and every interest or estate
in real property, whether corporeal  or incorporeal, whether freehold or nonfreehold, whether held
separately or in common with  others and whether the real property is situated in this state or
elsewhere.
(20) “Real estate broker” means an individual who holds an active license as  a real estate bro-
ker issued under ORS 696.022.
(21) “Real estate licensee” means an individual  who holds an active license or an active limited
license as a real estate broker, principal  real estate broker , [ or] licensed real estate property man-
ager or timeshare sales agent .
(22) “Real estate property manager” means a real estate  licensee who engages in the manage-
ment of rental real estate and is a licensed real estate  property manager, a principal real estate
broker or a real  estate broker who is associated with and supervised by a principal real estate
broker.
(23) “Registered  business name” means a name registered with the Real Estate Agency under
which the individual registering the name engages in professional real estate activity.
(24) “Timeshare” has the meaning given that term in ORS 94.803.
(25) “Timeshare  sales agent” means an individual who holds an active license as a
timeshare sales agent issued under ORS 696.022 and is not a real estate broker or  principal
real estate broker.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 696.010, as amended by section 10, chapter 3, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 3
696.010. As used in ORS  696.010 to 696.495, 696.600 to 696.785, 696.800 to 696.870, 696.990 and
696.995 and sections 1 to 9, chapter 3, Oregon Laws 2024, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Associated with” means to be employed, engaged or otherwise supervised by, with  respect
to the relationship between:
(a) A real estate broker and a principal real estate broker;
(b) A licensed real estate property manager and a principal real estate broker; or
(c) A licensed real estate property manager and another licensed real estate property manager.
(2) “Bank” includes  any bank or trust company, savings bank, mutual savings bank, savings and
loan association or credit union that maintains a head office or  a branch in this state in the ca-
pacity of a bank or trust company, savings  bank, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association
or credit union.
(3)(a) “Branch office” means a business location, other than  the main office designated under
ORS 696.200, where professional real estate activity is  regularly conducted or that is advertised to
the public as a place where professional real estate activity may be regularly conducted.
(b) Model units or  temporary structures used solely for the dissemination of information and
distribution of lawfully required public reports shall not be considered branch offices. A model  unit
means a permanent residential structure located in a subdivision or development  used for such dis-
semination and distribution, so long as the unit is at all times available  for sale, lease, lease option
or exchange.
(4) “Business day” means a day other than Saturday or Sunday or a federal or State of Oregon
legal holiday.
(5) “Commingle” means the  mixing of funds from any source, including personal funds, with trust
funds as defined in ORS 696.241, by a  licensed real estate property manager or principal real estate
broker, except as specifically authorized by this chapter.
(6) “Compensation” means valuable consideration for  services rendered or to be rendered,
whether contingent or otherwise.
(7) “Competitive market analysis” means a method or  process used by a real estate licensee in
pursuing a listing agreement or in formulating an offer to  acquire real estate in a transaction for
the sale, lease,  lease-option or exchange of real estate. The objective of competitive market analysis
is a recommended listing, selling or purchase price or a lease or rental consideration.  A competitive
market analysis may be expressed as an opinion  of the value of the real estate in a contemplated
transaction. Competitive market analysis may include but is not limited to  an analysis of market
conditions, public records, past transactions and current listings of real estate.
(8) “Expired” means, in the context of a real estate licensee, that the license has not  been re-
newed in a timely manner, but may still be renewed.
(9) “Inactive” means, in the  context of a real estate licensee, that the licensee is not authorized
to engage in professional real  estate activity. The inactive status of a license continues until the
license is reactivated or the license expires or lapses.
(10) “Lapsed” means, in  the context of a real estate licensee, that the license has not been re-
newed in a timely manner and is not eligible for renewal.
(11) “Letter opinion” has the meaning given that term in ORS 696.294.
(12) “Licensed real estate property manager” means an individual who holds an  active real es-
tate property manager’s license issued under ORS 696.022.
(13) “Main office” means the office designated by  a principal real estate broker or licensed real
estate property manager pursuant to ORS 696.200.
(14) “Management of rental real estate” means:
(a) Representing  the owner of real estate under a property management agreement in the rental
or lease of the real estate and includes but is not limited to:
(A) Advertising the real estate for rent or lease;
(B) Procuring prospective tenants to rent or lease the real estate;
(C) Negotiating with prospective tenants;
(D) Accepting deposits from prospective tenants;
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 4
(E) Checking the qualifications and creditworthiness of prospective tenants;
(F) Charging and collecting rent or lease payments;
(G) Representing the owner in inspection or repair of the real estate;
(H) Contracting for repair or remodeling of the real estate;
(I) Holding trust funds or property received in managing the real estate  and accounting to the
owner for the funds or property;
(J) Advising the owner regarding renting or leasing the real estate;
(K) Providing staff and services to accommodate the tax reporting and other financial or ac-
counting needs of the real estate;
(L) Providing copies of records of acts performed on behalf of the owner of the real  estate; and
(M) Offering or attempting to do any of the  acts described in this paragraph for the owner of
the real estate; or
(b) Representing a tenant  or prospective tenant when renting or leasing real estate for which
a real estate property manager has a property management agreement  with the owner of the real
estate and includes but is not limited to:
(A) Consulting with tenants or prospective tenants about renting or leasing real estate;
(B) Assisting prospective tenants in renting or leasing real estate;
(C) Assisting prospective tenants in qualifying for renting or leasing real estate;
(D) Accepting deposits or other funds from prospective tenants for renting or  leasing real estate
and holding the funds in trust for the prospective tenants;
(E) Representing tenants or prospective tenants renting or leasing real estate; and
(F) Offering or attempting to do any of the acts described in this  paragraph for a tenant or
prospective tenant.
(15) “Nonlicensed individual” means an individual:
(a) Who has not obtained a real estate license; or
(b) Whose real estate license is lapsed, expired, inactive, suspended, surrendered or revoked.
(16) “Principal real estate broker” means an individual who holds an active license as a princi-
pal real estate broker issued under ORS 696.022.
(17) “Professional real estate activity” means any of the following actions, when engaged  in for
another and for compensation or with  the intention or in the expectation or upon the promise of
receiving or collecting compensation, by any person who:
(a) Sells, exchanges, purchases, rents or leases real estate;
(b) Offers to sell, exchange, purchase, rent or lease real estate;
(c) Negotiates, offers,  attempts or agrees to negotiate the sale, exchange, purchase, rental or
leasing of real estate;
(d) Lists, offers, attempts or agrees to list real estate for sale;
(e) Offers, attempts or  agrees to perform or provide a competitive market analysis or letter
opinion, to represent a taxpayer under ORS 305.239  or 309.100 or to give an opinion in any admin-
istrative or judicial proceeding regarding  the value of real estate for taxation, except when the ac-
tivity is performed by a state certified appraiser or state licensed appraiser;
(f) Auctions, offers, attempts or agrees to auction real estate;
(g) Buys, sells, offers to buy or sell or otherwise deals in options on real estate;
(h) Engages in management of rental real estate;
(i) Purports to be engaged in the  business of buying, selling, exchanging, renting or leasing real
estate;
(j) Assists or directs in the procuring of prospects, calculated to result in the sale,  exchange,
leasing or rental of real estate;
(k) Assists or directs in the negotiation  or closing of any transaction calculated or intended to
result in the sale, exchange, leasing or rental of real estate;
(L) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 696.030 (12), advises, counsels, consults or  analyzes in
connection with real estate values, sales or dispositions, including dispositions through  eminent do-
main procedures;
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 5
(m) Advises, counsels, consults or analyzes in connection with the acquisition or sale of  real
estate by an entity if the purpose of the entity is investment in real estate; or
(n) Performs real estate marketing activity as described in ORS 696.600.
(18) “Property management agreement”  means a written contract for the management of rental
real estate between a real estate property manager and the owner of the rental real estate.
(19) “Real estate” includes  leaseholds and licenses to use including, but not limited to, timeshare
estates and timeshare licenses as defined in ORS  94.803, as well as any and every interest or estate
in real property, whether corporeal  or incorporeal, whether freehold or nonfreehold, whether held
separately or in common with  others and whether the real property is situated in this state or
elsewhere.
(20) “Real estate broker” means an individual who holds an active license as  a real estate bro-
ker issued under ORS 696.022.
(21) “Real estate licensee” means an individual  who holds an active license or an active limited
license as a real estate broker, principal  real estate broker , [ or] licensed real estate property man-
ager or timeshare sales agent .
(22) “Real estate property manager” means a real estate  licensee who engages in the manage-
ment of rental real estate and is a licensed real estate  property manager, a principal real estate
broker or a real  estate broker who is associated with and supervised by a principal real estate
broker.
(23) “Registered  business name” means a name registered with the Real Estate Agency under
which the individual registering the name engages in professional real estate activity.
(24) “Timeshare” has the meaning given that term in ORS 94.803.
(25) “Timeshare  sales agent” means an individual who holds an active license as a
timeshare sales agent issued under ORS 696.022 and is not a real estate broker or  principal
real estate broker.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 696.020 is amended to read:
696.020. (1) The Real Estate Agency may issue a real estate license only to an individual.
(2) An individual may not engage in, carry on, advertise or purport to engage in  or carry on
professional  real  estate activity, or act in the capacity of a real estate licensee, within this state
unless the individual holds an active license as provided for in this chapter.
(3) Real estate brokers and principal real  estate brokers are bound by and subject to the re-
quirements of ORS 696.010 to 696.495, 696.600 to 696.785, 696.800  to 696.870, 696.990 and 696.995
while:
(a) Engaging in professional real estate activity; or
(b) Acting on the licensee’s own behalf in the sale, exchange, lease option  or purchase of real
estate or in the offer or negotiations for the  sale, exchange, lease option or purchase of real estate.
(4) A [ real estate licensee ] real estate broker, principal real estate  broker or licensed real
estate property manager  is bound by and subject to the requirements of ORS 696.010 to 696.495,
696.600 to 696.785, 696.890, 696.990  and 696.995 while engaging in the management of rental real
estate.
(5) A  timeshare sales agent is bound by and subject to the requirements of ORS 696.010
to 696.495, 696.600 to 696.785, 696.800  to 696.870, 696.990 and 696.995 while selling or offering
to sell timeshares.
[(5)] (6) The agency by rule may establish provisions for a nonlicensed  individual whose license
is inactive or suspended and who acts on the licensee’s own  behalf in the sale, exchange, lease op-
tion or purchase of real estate or in the offer or negotiations for  the sale, exchange, lease option
or purchase of real estate.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 696.022 is amended to read:
696.022. (1) The Real Estate Agency shall establish by  rule a system for licensing real estate
brokers, principal real  estate brokers , [ and] licensed real estate property managers  and timeshare
sales agents . The system shall establish, at a minimum:
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 6
(a) The form and content of applications for licensing under each category of real estate pro-
fessional licensed by the agency;
(b) A licensing examination for each category of license;
(c) Schedules and procedures for issuing  and renewing licenses, including limited licenses under
ORS 696.125; and
(d) The term of a license in each category.
(2)(a) A real estate broker may engage in professional real  estate activity only if the broker is
associated with and supervised by a principal real estate broker. Except  as provided in paragraph
(c) of this subsection, a real estate broker may  not employ, engage or supervise the professional real
estate activity of another real estate licensee.
(b) For an applicant to qualify  for a real estate broker’s license, the Real Estate Commissioner
must receive:
(A) Certification by the  applicant that the applicant has a high school diploma or a certificate
for passing an approved high school equivalency test  such as the General Educational Development
(GED) test or the international equivalent, or other  equivalent education acceptable to the com-
missioner;
(B) Proof that the applicant:
(i) Has successfully completed the basic real estate broker’s educational courses  required by the
agency by rule; and
(ii) Has passed the real estate broker’s examination required by the agency by rule; and
(C) Certification that the applicant is at least 18 years of age.
(c) A real estate  broker who has acquired three years of active experience as a real estate
broker may supervise for up  to 90 days the professional real estate activity of another real estate
licensee due to unforeseen circumstances  or the temporary absence of a sole principal real estate
broker, as provided by the agency by rule.
(3)(a) A principal real estate broker may engage in professional real estate activity.
(b) A principal real estate broker may conduct  professional real estate activity in conjunction
with other  real estate brokers, principal real estate brokers or licensed real estate property man-
agers. A principal real  estate broker may employ, engage or supervise the professional real estate
activity of another real estate licensee.
(c) For an  applicant to qualify for a principal real estate broker’s license, the commissioner must
receive:
(A) Certification by the  applicant that the applicant has a high school diploma or a certificate
for passing an approved high school equivalency test  such as the General Educational Development
(GED) test or the international equivalent, or other  equivalent education acceptable to the com-
missioner;
(B) Proof that the applicant:
(i) Has three years  of active licensed experience as a licensed real estate broker or a licensed
real estate salesperson in this state or another state;
(ii) Has  passed the principal real estate broker’s examination required by the agency by rule;
and
(iii) Has successfully completed the brokerage administration  and sales supervision course re-
quired by the agency by rule; and
(C) Certification that the applicant is at least 18 years of age.
(4)(a) An individual who holds a real estate property manager license  may engage only in the
management of rental real estate under a property management agreement with the owner  of the
rental real estate.
(b) A licensed real estate property manager may employ, engage or  supervise the professional
real estate activity of another licensed real estate property manager.
(c) For an applicant to qualify for a real estate property manager’s  license, the commissioner
must receive:
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 7
(A) Certification by the applicant that the applicant has a high school diploma  or a certificate
for passing an approved high school equivalency test  such as the General Educational Development
(GED) test or the international equivalent, or  other equivalent education acceptable to the com-
missioner;
(B) Proof that the applicant:
(i) Has successfully completed the basic real estate property manager’s  educational courses re-
quired by the agency by rule; and
(ii) Has passed the real estate property manager’s  license examination required by the agency
by rule; and
(C) Certification that the applicant is at least 18 years of age.
(5)(a) The only professional  real estate activity an individual who holds a timeshare sales
agent license may engage in is selling or offering to sell timeshares. A timeshare sales agent
must be associated with and supervised by  a principal real estate broker. A timeshare sales
agent may  not employ, engage or supervise the professional real estate activity of another
real estate licensee.
(b) For an applicant to qualify for a timeshare sales  agent license, the commissioner
must receive:
(A) Proof that the applicant has successfully completed  at least 14 hours of instruction
in:
(i) Ethics;
(ii) The applicable laws and rules relating to timeshares; and
(iii) The principles and practices of selling timeshares;
(B) Proof that the applicant has passed the timeshare sales agent’s examination required
by the agency by rule; and
(C) Certification that the applicant is at least 18 years of age.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a)  A license for a real estate broker, principal real estate broker , [ or] licensed real
estate property manager  or timeshare sales agent  may be  granted only to an individual who is
trustworthy and competent to conduct  professional real estate activity in a manner that protects the
public interest. As a condition of licensing,  the commissioner may require proof of competence and
trustworthiness that the commissioner deems necessary to protect the public interest.
(b) In  implementing this subsection, the commissioner shall require fingerprints and criminal
offender information of an applicant for initial licensing and may require fingerprints and criminal
offender information of an applicant for license renewal. Fingerprints acquired under this sub-
section may be used for the purpose of requesting a state  or nationwide criminal records check
under ORS 181A.195.
[(6)] (7) An individual licensed to engage in professional real estate activity  in another state or
country may qualify for a principal real estate broker  license, real estate broker license , [ or] real
estate property manager license  or timeshare sales  agent license  if the individual successfully
completes the course of study for and passes the  license examination corresponding to the license
for which the individual applies, both as prescribed  by agency rule, and if the individual meets the
other requirements for licensure in this chapter.
[(7)] (8)  In order to satisfy the educational requirements under subsections (2)  to [ (4) and (6) ]
(5) and (7)  of this section, a course must be  approved by the commissioner. The commissioner shall
determine the final examination score acceptable as evidence of successful completion for each re-
quired course.
[(8)] (9)  The Real Estate Board may determine that an  applicant for a principal real estate
broker’s license has experience related to  professional real estate activity that is equivalent to the
experience required under subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 696.026 is amended to read:
696.026. (1) The Real Estate Agency shall establish by rule  systems for the registration and re-
newal of business names.
(2) The registration system must:
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 8
(a) Require the physical address associated with a registered business name to be the  main of-
fice of a principal real estate broker or licensed real estate property manager;
(b) Require the registered business name to be:
(A) The corporate name, professional  corporate name, business corporate name, cooperative
name, limited partnership name, business trust name, reserved name, registered corporate name or
assumed business name of active record with the Office of the Secretary of State; or
(B) The name under which the principal real estate  broker or licensed real estate property
manager license was issued;
(c) Allow a principal real estate broker or licensed real estate property manager to register  one
or more branch offices under the registered business name of the main office; and
(d) Require the name of the principal real estate broker or licensed real estate property manager
who is responsible for:
(A) Maintaining the registration of the business name;
(B) Registering any branch offices of the registered business name;
(C) Registering any additional business names, as described in subsection (14) of this section;
(D) Maintaining the information  described in ORS 696.245 for each clients’ trust account opened,
closed or transferred by a principal real estate broker or licensed real estate  property manager who
conducts professional real estate activity under the registered business name;
(E) Renewing the registration of the business name;
(F) Changing the registered business name, including the associated branch offices;
(G) Maintaining the business address of the main office and any associated branch offices of the
registered business name as required by ORS 696.200; and
(H) Inactivating or  reactivating the registration of the business name and associated branch
offices.
(3) The renewal system must establish:
(a) The form and content of the renewal application;
(b) The schedule for  annual renewals of registered business names, including the date of the
registered business name expiration; and
(c) The procedures for renewing a registered business name.
(4) Failure to  renew a registered business name and pay any required fees by the expiration date
of the registration will result in:
(a) The expiration of the registered business name;
(b) The inactivation of all associated licensees; and
(c) The inactivation of all associated branch offices.
(5) The Real Estate Commissioner  may by rule provide an opportunity for the late renewal of
an expired registered business name.
(6) Only a principal real  estate broker or licensed real estate property manager may register a
business name or register a branch office under the registered business name of the main office.
(7) Only a principal real estate broker or licensed  real estate property manager may control and
supervise the professional real estate activity conducted under the registered business name.
(8) A business name registered under this section has no license standing.
(9) All professional real estate activity conducted  by the principal real estate broker, licensed
real estate property manager or real estate licensees associated with a principal real estate broker
or licensed real estate property manager must be conducted under  an active registered business
name.
(10) A principal real estate broker or licensed  real estate property manager who registers a
business name need not be an owner or officer of any entity lawfully entitled to use  or have an
ownership interest in the registered business name. However, only a principal  real estate broker or
licensed  real  estate property manager may control and supervise the professional real estate activity
conducted under the registered business name.
(11) A real estate broker  or timeshare sales agent  associated  with a principal real estate
broker may have an  ownership interest in any business through which the principal real estate
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 9
broker conducts professional real estate activity, but may not  control or supervise the professional
real estate activity of any other real estate licensee.
(12) A licensed real estate property manager associated  with a principal real estate broker may
have an ownership interest in  any business through which the principal real estate broker conducts
professional real estate activity,  but may not control or supervise the professional real estate ac-
tivity of a real estate broker or principal real estate broker.
(13) A nonlicensed individual may have an ownership  interest in any business through which a
licensed  real  estate property manager or principal real estate broker engages in professional real
estate activity, but  may not control or supervise the professional real estate activity of any real
estate licensee.
(14)(a) A principal real estate broker or licensed real estate property manager who  registers a
business name may register additional business names  for business organizations that are affiliated
with the registered business name, or  business organizations that are subsidiaries of the business
with the registered name.
(b) A principal real estate  broker or licensed real estate property manager may conduct pro-
fessional real estate activity under  two or more registered business names only if the business or-
ganizations are affiliated with, or subsidiaries of, the business with the registered name.
(15) The agency shall establish by rule  procedures to allow a real estate broker or principal real
estate broker who  becomes associated with a different registered business name to continue to en-
gage in professional real estate activity on transactions  that began while the real estate broker or
principal real estate broker was associated with the original registered business name.
SECTION 6.  ORS 696.030 is amended to read:
696.030. ORS 696.010 to 696.375, 696.392, 696.395 to 696.430, 696.490, 696.600 to 696.785, 696.990
and 696.995 do not apply to:
(1)(a) A nonlicensed individual who is a full-time employee of an owner of real estate and whose
real estate activity:
(A) Involves only the real estate of the employer; and
(B)(i) Is incidental to the employee’s normal, nonreal estate activities; or
(ii) Is the employee’s principal activity, but the employer’s principal activity or  business is not
the sale, exchange, lease option or acquisition of real estate.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, “owner of real estate” means:
(A) A person who has a sole ownership interest in the real estate; or
(B) More than one person, each of  whom has an ownership interest in the real estate, if the
ownership interest is by survivorship, tenancy in common or tenancy by the entirety.
(2) A nonlicensed individual who acts as attorney in  fact under a duly executed power of at-
torney from the  owner or purchaser authorizing the supervision of the closing of or supervision of
the performance of a contract for the sale, leasing or exchanging of real estate if the  power of at-
torney  was  executed prior to July 1, 2002, in compliance with the requirements of law at the time
of execution or if:
(a) The power of attorney is recorded in the office of the recording  officer for the county in
which the real estate is located;
(b) The power of attorney specifically describes the real estate; and
(c) The nonlicensed individual does not use the power of attorney as a device to engage  in
professional real estate activity without obtaining the necessary real estate license.
(3) A nonlicensed individual who acts as attorney in  fact under a duly executed power of at-
torney in which the authorized  agent is the spouse of the principal, or the child, grandchild, parent,
grandparent, sibling, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew of the principal or of  the spouse of the principal,
authorizing real  estate activity if the power of attorney is recorded in the office of the recording
officer for the county in which the real estate to be sold, leased or exchanged is located.
(4) A nonlicensed individual  who is an attorney at law rendering services in the performance
of duties as an attorney at law.
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 10
(5) A  nonlicensed individual who acts in the nonlicensed individual’s official capacity as a re-
ceiver, a conservator, a trustee in bankruptcy, a personal representative or  a trustee, or a regular
salaried employee of the trustee, acting under a trust agreement, deed of trust or will.
(6) A nonlicensed individual who performs an act of  professional real estate activity under order
of a court.
(7) A nonlicensed  individual who is a regular full-time employee of a single corporation, part-
nership, association, limited liability company or nonlicensed individual owner of  real property act-
ing for the corporation, partnership, association, limited liability company  or nonlicensed individual
owner in the rental or management of the real property, but not  in the sale, exchange, lease option
or purchase of the real property.
(8) A nonlicensed individual who is a  registered professional engineer or architect rendering
services in performance of duties as a professional engineer or architect.
(9) A nonlicensed individual who is employed by a principal real  estate broker engaged in the
management of rental real estate  or by a licensed real estate property manager and who acts on
behalf of the principal real estate  broker or licensed real estate property manager pursuant to a
written delegation of  the principal real estate broker’s or licensed real estate property manager’s
authority, as provided by the agency by rule, if the real estate activity of the nonlicensed  individual
is limited to:
(a) Negotiating rental or lease agreements;
(b) Checking tenant and credit references;
(c) Physically maintaining the real estate;
(d) Conducting tenant relations;
(e) Collecting the rent;
(f) Supervising the premises’ managers;
(g) Discussing financial matters relating to the management of the real estate with the  owner;
and
(h) Receiving and disbursing trust funds in a clients’ trust account under ORS 696.241.
(10) A nonlicensed individual who sells or leases cemetery lots, parcels  or units while engaged
in the disposition of human bodies under ORS  97.010 to 97.040, 97.110 to 97.450, 97.510 to 97.730,
97.810 to 97.920 and 97.990 or an employee of the nonlicensed individual performing similar  activ-
ities.
(11) A nonlicensed individual who is a salaried employee of the  State of Oregon, or any of its
political subdivisions, engaging in professional real estate activity as a part of such employment.
(12) A nonlicensed individual who analyzes or provides advice  regarding permissible land use
alternatives, environmental impact, building and use permit procedures, development alternatives
or demographic market studies or who performs development management, or  a regular full-time
employee of the nonlicensed individual performing similar activities. This exclusion does  not apply
to marketing, procuring prospects, leasing or the handling of  transactional negotiations for transfer
of an interest in real estate.
(13) An individual  who is a hotelkeeper or innkeeper as defined by ORS 699.005 arranging the
rental of transient lodging at a hotel or inn in the course of business as a hotelkeeper or  innkeeper.
(14) A nonlicensed individual who is a travel agent arranging the rental of transient lodging at
a hotel or inn as defined in ORS 699.005 in the course of  business as a travel agent for compen-
sation. For the purpose of this subsection, “travel agent” means a  person, and employees of the
person, regularly representing and selling travel services to the  public directly or through other
travel agents.
(15) A nonlicensed individual  who is a common carrier arranging the rental of transient lodging
at a hotel or  inn as defined in ORS 699.005 in the course of business as a common carrier. For the
purpose of this subsection, “common carrier”  means a person that transports or purports to be
willing to transport individuals  from place to place by rail, motor vehicle, boat or aircraft for hire,
compensation or consideration.
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 11
(16) A nonlicensed individual who is a hotel  representative arranging the rental of transient
lodging at a hotel or inn as defined in ORS  699.005 in the course of business as a hotel represen-
tative. For the purpose of this subsection, “hotel representative” means a  person that provides res-
ervations or sale services to independent hotels, airlines, steamship companies and  government
tourist agencies.
(17) A nonlicensed individual transferring or acquiring  an interest in real estate owned or to
be owned by the nonlicensed individual.
(18) A nonlicensed individual who is a general partner for a domestic or foreign  limited part-
nership duly registered and operating within this state under ORS chapter 70 engaging  in the sale
of limited partnership  interests and the acquisition, sale, exchange, lease, transfer or management
of the real estate of the limited partnership.
(19) A nonlicensed individual who is  a membership camping contract broker or salesperson
registered with the Real Estate Agency selling membership camping contracts.
(20) A nonlicensed individual who is a  professional forester or farm manager engaging in prop-
erty management activity on forestland or farmland when  the activity is incidental to the nonreal
estate duties involving overall management of forest or farm resources.
(21) A nonlicensed individual who is a registered investment adviser under the Investment Ad-
visers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. 80b-1 et seq., rendering  real estate investment services for the office
of the State Treasurer or the Oregon Investment Council.
(22) A nonlicensed individual who refers a new tenant for  compensation to a real estate licensee
acting as the property manager for a residential building or facility  while the nonlicensed individual
resides in the building  or facility or within six months after termination of the nonlicensed
individual’s tenancy.
(23) A nonlicensed individual  who gives an opinion in an administrative or judicial proceeding
regarding the value of real estate for taxation or representing a taxpayer  under ORS 305.239 or
309.100.
(24) A nonlicensed individual acting as a paid fiduciary whose  real estate activity is limited to
negotiating a contract to obtain the services of a real estate licensee.
(25) A nonlicensed individual who is acting as a fiduciary under a court order, without regard
to whether the court order specifically authorizes real estate activity.
(26) A nonlicensed individual who is a representative of a  financial institution or trust company,
as those terms are defined in ORS 706.008,  that is attorney in fact under a duly executed power of
attorney  from  the owner or purchaser authorizing real estate activity, if the power of attorney is
recorded in the office of the county clerk for the county in which the real estate to be sold, leased
or exchanged is located.
(27) A nonlicensed individual who is a member  of a domestic or foreign limited liability company
duly registered and operating within this state under ORS chapter 63 and who  is engaging in the
acquisition, sale, exchange, lease,  transfer or management of the real estate of the limited liability
company if:
(a) The limited liability company is member-managed; or
(b) The limited liability company is manager-managed,  and the nonlicensed individual is a man-
ager.
(28) A nonlicensed individual who is a partner in a partnership as defined in ORS  67.005 and
who is engaging in the acquisition, sale, exchange, lease, transfer or management of  the real estate
of the partnership.
(29) A nonlicensed individual  who is an officer or director of a domestic or foreign corporation
duly registered and operating within  this state under ORS chapter 60 and who is engaging in the
acquisition, sale, exchange, lease, transfer or management of the real estate of the corporation.
(30) A nonlicensed individual who transfers a timeshare:
(a) By deed in lieu of foreclosure;
(b) As part of a foreclosure sale; or
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 12
(c) As part of a resale by a managing entity of a timeshare that  has been acquired by the
managing entity:
(A) As a result of terminating a contractual right of occupancy;
(B) By deed in lieu of foreclosure, other transfer or termination; or
(C) At a foreclosure sale.
(31) A nonlicensed individual who offers for sale a timeshare owned by the individual.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 696.125 is amended to read:
696.125. (1) The Real Estate Commissioner may issue a limited license to an applicant for a li-
cense as a real estate broker, principal real  estate broker , [ or] real estate property manager  or
timeshare sales agent  if the commissioner determines that  the issuance is in the public interest.
The commissioner may limit a license issued under this section:
(a) By term;
(b) To acts subject to the supervision of a specific principal real estate broker;
(c) By conditions to be observed in the exercise and the privileges granted; or
(d) In other ways determined by the commissioner as necessary  or appropriate to protect the
public.
(2) A limited license issued under  this section may be renewed as provided by the commissioner
by rule. A limited license may be suspended or revoked, or the real estate  licensee may be
reprimanded, by the commissioner on the  grounds set out in ORS 696.301 or for failure to comply
with the limitations of the license.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 696.130 is amended to read:
696.130. (1)(a) If the license  of a real estate broker , [ or] principal real estate broker  or
timeshare sales agent  is revoked by the Real Estate Commissioner  on grounds related to profes-
sional real estate activity other than the  management of rental real estate, the commissioner may
not issue a new license until the individual complies with the provisions of ORS 696.010 to 696.495,
696.600 to 696.785 and 696.800 to 696.870.
(b) If the license of a licensed real estate property manager is revoked by the commissioner,  or
if the license  of a real estate broker or principal real estate broker is revoked by the commissioner,
on grounds related to the management of rental real estate, the commissioner may not issue  a new
license until the individual complies with the provisions of ORS 696.010 to 696.495, 696.600 to 696.785
and 696.890.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner may issue the individual a
limited license if, in the discretion of the commissioner, it  is in the public interest to do so. The
commissioner may limit a license issued under this subsection:
(a) By term;
(b) To acts subject to the supervision of a specific principal real estate broker; or
(c) By conditions to be observed in the exercise and the privileges granted.
(3) A limited license issued under  this section may be renewed as provided by the commissioner
by rule. A limited license  may be suspended or revoked, or the licensee may be reprimanded, by the
commissioner on the grounds set out in ORS 696.301.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 696.174 is amended to read:
696.174. (1) To renew an active license  or to reactivate a license for the first time since the li-
cense was renewed to an  inactive status, a real estate licensee , other than a timeshare sales
agent, must complete 30 hours of  real estate continuing education courses that are eligible for
credit under ORS 696.182 during the two years  preceding the renewal or reactivation. The 30 hours
must include:
(a) At least three hours in a course approved by the Real Estate Board on state and  federal fair
housing laws and recent changes in real estate rule and law; and
(b)(A) If the real estate broker is renewing  an active license for the first time or reactivating
a license for the first time since renewing the license to  an inactive status, an advanced course in
real estate practices approved by the Real Estate Agency;
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 13
(B) If  a licensed real estate property manager is renewing an active license for the first time
or reactivating a  license for the first time since renewing the license to an inactive status, an ad-
vanced course in property management practices approved by the agency; or
(C) If a principal real estate broker is renewing an active license for the first time or reacti-
vating a license for the first time since renewing the  license to an inactive status, an advanced
course in brokerage practices approved by the agency.
(2) The agency, in consultation with real estate professionals and educators, shall  develop a
reporting format to ensure  that a real estate licensee , other than a timeshare sales agent,  has
completed  the  number of hours required by subsection (1) of this section. The reporting format must
include:
(a) The date, name and length of time of each course attended;
(b) The name of the real estate continuing education provider that offered the course;
(c) The name of the instructor who taught the course; and
(d) Any other information that the agency requires by rule.
(3) The agency may waive any portion  of the requirements of this section for a real estate
licensee who submits satisfactory evidence that poor health or  other circumstances beyond the real
estate licensee’s control prevented the real estate licensee from attending part or all  of the contin-
uing education courses required by subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 696.241 is amended to read:
696.241. (1) As used in this section, “trust funds”  means money belonging to others that is re-
ceived or handled by a licensed real estate property manager or principal real estate broker in  the
course of conducting professional real estate activity and in the  real estate licensee’s fiduciary ca-
pacity.
(2) A licensed  real estate property manager, or a principal real estate broker who engages in
the management of rental real estate, shall open and maintain in this state one or more separate
federally insured bank accounts that are designated  clients’ trust accounts under ORS 696.245. A
principal real estate broker who engages in the management of  rental real estate or a licensed real
estate property manager shall deposit in a clients’ trust account  all trust funds received or handled
by the principal  real estate broker, licensed real estate property manager or real estate licensees ,
other than a timeshare sales agent,  subject to the supervision of the principal real estate  broker.
(3)(a) A principal real estate  broker who receives or handles trust funds and does not deposit
the trust funds in a licensed neutral escrow depository  as described in paragraph (b) of this sub-
section shall open and maintain in this state one or more separate federally  insured bank accounts
that are designated clients’ trust accounts under ORS 696.245. Pursuant  to written agreement of all
parties to a real estate transaction having an interest  in the trust funds, the principal real estate
broker shall immediately place the trust funds in a clients’ trust account.
(b) A principal real estate broker may deposit trust funds in a licensed  neutral escrow deposi-
tory in this state.
(4) A principal real estate broker or licensed real  estate property manager who opens a clients’
trust account under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, or to whom ownership of a clients’ trust
account is transferred, is liable for all deposits and  disbursements made using the clients’ trust ac-
count until the principal real estate broker  or licensed real estate property manager closes the ac-
count or transfers ownership of the account.
(5) A principal real estate broker or  licensed real estate property manager may not commingle
any other funds with the trust funds held in a clients’ trust account, except for:
(a) Earned interest on a clients’ trust account as provided in subsections (7) and (8) of  this
section; and
(b) Earned compensation as provided in subsection (9) of this section.
(6) If a licensed real estate  property manager or principal real estate broker maintains a sepa-
rate clients’ trust account in a branch office, a separate bookkeeping system  must be maintained in
the branch office and a copy of the  records required under ORS 696.280 must be maintained in the
main office of the licensed real estate property manager or principal real estate broker.
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 14
(7) Trust funds received by a licensed real estate property manager or  principal real estate
broker  may be deposited by the licensed real estate property manager or principal real estate broker
in a federally insured interest-bearing bank account that is  designated a clients’ trust account under
ORS 696.245, but only with the prior written approval of all parties who have an interest in the trust
funds. The earnings of the interest-bearing  account inure to the benefit of the licensed real estate
property manager or principal real estate broker only if expressly approved in writing by  all parties
who have an interest in the trust funds before deposit of the trust funds.
(8) With prior written notice to all parties  who have an interest in the trust funds, a principal
real estate broker may place trust funds received by the principal  real estate broker in a real estate
sales, purchase or exchange transaction in a federally insured  interest-bearing bank account that is
designated a clients’ trust  account under ORS 696.245, the earnings of which inure to the benefit
of a public benefit corporation, as defined in ORS 65.001, for distribution  to organizations and indi-
viduals for  first-time homebuying assistance and for development of affordable housing. The principal
real estate broker shall select a qualified public benefit corporation to  receive the interest earnings.
(9) In connection with a real estate sales, purchase or  exchange transaction, a principal real
estate broker is not entitled to any part of any interest earnings on trust funds deposited  under
subsection (7) of this section or to any part of the earnest  money or other money paid to the prin-
cipal real estate broker as part  or all of the principal real estate broker’s compensation until the
transaction has been completed  or terminated. The principal real estate broker and the seller shall
negotiate and agree  in writing to the disposition of forfeited earnest money at the time of execution
by the seller of any listing  agreement or earnest money agreement. An agreement about the dispo-
sition of forfeited earnest money must be  initialed by the seller or immediately precede the seller’s
signature.
(10) Trust funds in a clients’ trust account are not  subject to execution or attachment on any
claim against a licensed real estate property manager or principal real estate broker.
(11) The Real Estate Agency by rule shall establish an optional procedure by which  a principal
real estate broker may elect to disburse disputed funds held in relation to the sale,  exchange or
purchase of real estate from a clients’ trust account to  the person who delivered the funds to the
principal real estate broker. The procedure must allow disbursal not more than  20 days after a re-
quest is made for the disbursal. A disbursal  pursuant to the procedure does not affect the claim of
any other person to the funds.
(12) The agency may provide by rule for other  records to be maintained and for the manner in
which trust  funds are deposited, held and disbursed. The rules adopted under this subsection may
include requirements for interest or compensation held in a clients’ trust account pursuant to  sub-
section (5) of this section to  be disbursed from the clients’ trust account to a licensed real estate
property manager or principal real estate broker.
(13) A real estate [ licensee] broker or principal real estate broker  who, for the purpose  of
transmitting a check, receives the check from a buyer or tenant that is payable  to a property owner
or seller is exempt from the deposit requirements of subsections  (2) and (3) of this section. [ The
agency may determine by rule the records that must be maintained for checks received as  described in
this subsection and the manner in which the checks must be transmitted. ]
(14) A licensed real estate property manager who, for the  purpose of transmitting a
check, receives the check from a tenant that is payable to a property owner  is exempt from
the deposit requirements of subsection (2) of this section.
(15) A  timeshare sales agent who, for the purpose of transmitting a check, receives the
check from a buyer that is payable to a property owner or seller is  exempt from the deposit
requirements of subsection (3) of this section.
(16) The agency may determine by rule the records that must be maintained  for checks
received as described in subsections (13), (14) and (15)  of this section and the manner in
which the checks must be transmitted.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 696.270 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 15
696.270. The Real Estate Commissioner, with the approval of the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services, shall prescribe the fees that the Real Estate Agency  may charge for activities
listed under this section, subject to the following maximum amounts:
(1) For each licensing examination applied for, $75.
(2) For each applicant for a real estate broker, principal real estate broker , [ or] licensed real
estate property manager  or timeshare sales agent  license:
(a) Application for license, $300; and
(b) Change of name, $10.
(3) For each real estate broker, principal real  estate broker , [ or] licensed real estate property
manager or timeshare sales agent  licensee:
(a) Renewal of active license or active limited license, $300;
(b) Renewal of inactive license or inactive limited license, $150;
(c) Late fee for renewal of active or inactive license charged in addition to the renewal fee,
$150;
(d) Change of name, $10;
(e) Transfer of license between registered business names, $10; and
(f) Reactivation of inactive license, $150.
(4) For each registered business name:
(a) Initial registration, $300;
(b) Renewal of active registration, $50; and
(c) Change of name, $300.
(5) For initial registration of each branch office, $50.
(6) For each temporary license issued under ORS 696.205:
(a) Initial issuance, $150; and
(b) Extension, $150.
(7) For each continuing education provider certification:
(a) Initial application, $300; and
(b) Renewal, $50.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 696.280 is amended to read:
696.280. (1) A licensed real estate  property manager or principal real estate broker shall main-
tain within this state,  except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, complete and adequate
records of all professional real estate activity conducted  by or through the licensed real estate
property manager or principal real estate broker. The Real Estate Agency shall specify by rule the
records required to establish complete and adequate records of a licensed  real estate property
manager’s or principal real estate  broker’s professional real estate activity. The only documents the
agency may require by rule a licensed real estate property manager or principal real estate  broker
to use or generate are documents that are otherwise required by law or are voluntarily generated
in the course of conducting professional real estate activity.
(2) A real estate licensee , other  than a timeshare sales agent,  shall maintain records of the
licensee’s attendance in continuing education courses for a period of at least three  years. The re-
cords of attendance must meet the requirements of ORS 696.174.
(3) Records maintained under this  section must at all times be open for inspection by the Real
Estate Commissioner or the commissioner’s authorized representatives.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, records under this section must  be
maintained by the  real estate licensee for a period of not less than six years after the following date:
(a) For a notice of clients’ trust account and authorization to examine under ORS 696.245,  the
date the account was closed;
(b) For real estate transactions, the date a transaction closed or failed, whichever is later;
(c) For management of rental real estate, the  date on which the record expired, was superseded
or terminated, or otherwise ceased to be in effect; and
(d) For all other records, the date the record was created or received, whichever is later.
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 16
(5) Records under this section may be maintained in any format that allows for  inspection and
copying by the commissioner  or the commissioner’s representatives, as prescribed by rule of the
agency.
(6) The agency may  prescribe by rule terms and conditions under which a licensed real estate
property manager or principal real estate broker may maintain records outside this state.
SECTION 13.  ORS 696.294 is amended to read:
696.294. [(1) As used in this section, “letter opinion” means a document that expresses a real  estate
licensee’s conclusion regarding a recommended listing, selling or purchase price or a rental or lease
consideration of certain real estate and that results from the licensee’s competitive market analysis. ]
(1) As used in this section, “letter opinion” means:
(a) A document that expresses a real estate broker’s, principal real estate  broker’s or
licensed real estate property  manager’s conclusion regarding a recommended listing, selling
or purchase price or a rental or lease consideration of certain real estate and that  results
from the licensee’s competitive market analysis; or
(b) A document that expresses a timeshare sales agent’s conclusion regarding  a recom-
mended listing, selling or purchase price of a timeshare and that results from the licensee’s
competitive market analysis.
(2) The Real Estate  Commissioner by rule shall specify the minimum contents of a letter opinion,
including but not limited to the distinction between a letter opinion and a real estate appraisal.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 696.301 is amended to read:
696.301. Subject to  ORS 696.396, the Real Estate Commissioner may suspend or revoke the real
estate license of any real estate licensee, reprimand any  real estate licensee or deny the issuance
or renewal of a license to an applicant who has:
(1) Created a reasonable probability of damage or injury to  a person by making one or more
material misrepresentations or false promises in a matter  related to professional real estate activity.
(2) Represented, attempted to represent  or accepted compensation from a principal real estate
broker other than the principal real  estate broker with whom the real estate broker  or timeshare
sales agent  is associated.
(3) Disregarded or violated  any provision of ORS 659A.421, 696.010 to 696.495, 696.600 to 696.785,
696.800 to 696.870 and 696.890 or any rule of the Real Estate Agency.
(4) Knowingly or recklessly published materially misleading or untruthful advertising.
(5) Acted as an agent and an undisclosed principal in any transaction.
(6) Intentionally interfered with the contractual relations of others concerning  real estate or
professional real estate activity.
(7) Intentionally interfered with the  exclusive representation or exclusive brokerage relationship
of another real estate licensee.
(8) Accepted employment or compensation for  the preparation of a competitive market analysis
or letter opinion that is contingent upon reporting a predetermined value  or for real estate in which
the real estate licensee had an undisclosed interest.
(9) Represented a taxpayer as described in ORS 305.239 or 309.100, contingent upon reporting
a predetermined value or for real estate in which the real estate licensee had an undisclosed inter-
est.
(10) Failed to ensure, in any real estate transaction in  which the real estate licensee performed
the closing, that the  buyer and seller received a complete detailed closing statement showing the
amount and purpose of all receipts, adjustments and disbursements.
(11) Has been convicted of a felony  or misdemeanor substantially related to the real estate
licensee’s trustworthiness or competence to engage in professional real estate activity.
(12) Demonstrated incompetence or untrustworthiness in  performing any act for which the real
estate licensee is required to hold a license.
(13) Violated a term, condition, restriction  or limitation contained in an order issued by the
commissioner.
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 17
(14) Committed an act  of fraud or engaged in dishonest conduct substantially related to the fit-
ness of the applicant or real estate licensee to conduct professional  real estate activity, without
regard to whether the act or conduct occurred in the course of professional real estate activity.
(15) Engaged in any conduct that is  below the standard of care for the practice of professional
real estate activity in Oregon as established by the community of individuals engaged in the practice
of professional real estate activity in Oregon.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 696.310 is amended to read:
696.310. (1) If two or more  principal real estate brokers are associated with the same registered
business name, the principal real estate brokers shall:
(a) Execute one or more written supervisory agreements between them that:
(A) Fully allocate the supervisory control and responsibility for the  professional real estate ac-
tivities of all real estate brokers and timeshare sales agents  associated with  the registered busi-
ness name;
(B) Include a default allocation of supervisory control and responsibility  for any real estate
brokers  and timeshare sales agents  who associate with the registered business name in the future
or who are otherwise omitted from the written supervisory agreement; and
(C) Include any supervisory control and  responsibility of one principal real estate broker over
another principal real estate broker;
(b) Update the written supervisory agreement if the disassociation of a principal real estate
broker occurs that affects the allocation of supervisory control or responsibility; and
(c) Share equal supervisory control and responsibility for any professional real estate activity
conducted by real estate brokers  and timeshare sales agents  associated with the registered busi-
ness name that is not otherwise covered by the written supervisory agreement.
(2) If a  licensed real estate property manager is associated with the same registered business
name as any combination of licensed real estate property managers and principal real  estate bro-
kers, the licensed real estate property managers and principal real estate brokers shall:
(a) Execute one or more written supervisory agreements between them that:
(A) Fully allocates supervisory  control and responsibility for management of rental real estate
conducted by all principal real estate brokers and licensed real estate  property managers associated
with the registered business name; and
(B) Includes any arrangement for supervisory control and responsibility  over the management
of rental real estate conducted by the licensed real estate property managers and principal real es-
tate brokers;
(b) Update the written supervisory agreement if another licensed real estate  property manager
or principal real estate broker associates with the registered business name; and
(c) Update the written supervisory agreement if the disassociation of a licensed real estate
property manager or  principal real estate broker occurs that affects the allocation of supervisory
control or responsibility over management of rental real estate.
(3) Licensed  real estate property managers and principal real estate brokers who do not exercise
administrative or supervisory control over one another are  each responsible for their own manage-
ment of rental real estate.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 696.320 is amended to read:
696.320. The suspension or revocation of a principal real  estate broker’s license renders inactive
every license of the real estate brokers  and timeshare sales agents  engaged by the principal  real
estate broker pending a transfer of the license. The  Real Estate Agency shall transfer a license
rendered inactive under this section if the real estate licensee requests a transfer within  30 days
after the effective date of the suspension  or revocation of the principal real estate broker’s license
and pays a transfer fee.
SECTION 17.  ORS 696.365 is amended to read:
696.365. (1) A city or county may not  impose a business license tax on or collect a business li-
cense tax from an individual licensed as a  real estate broker  or a timeshare sales agent  who en-
gages in professional real estate activity only as an agent of a principal real estate broker.
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 18
(2) As used in this section, “business license tax” has the meaning given  that term in ORS
701.015.
SECTION 18.  ORS 696.710 is amended to read:
696.710. (1) A real estate broker , [ or] principal real estate broker  or timeshare  sales agent
conducting professional real estate activity  within this state may not bring or maintain any action
for the collection of compensation without alleging and proving  that the individual was a real estate
licensee when the alleged cause of action arose.
(2) An action for collection of compensation from a client for professional real estate  activity
conducted  by  a real estate broker  or timeshare sales agent  associated with a principal real estate
broker may not be brought or maintained except by the principal real  estate broker with whom the
real estate broker or timeshare  sales agent  was associated when the alleged cause of action arose.
SECTION 19. (1) The amendments to ORS 696.010, 696.020,  696.022, 696.026, 696.030,
696.125, 696.130, 696.174, 696.241, 696.270, 696.280, 696.294, 696.301, 696.310, 696.320, 696.365 and
696.710 by sections 1 to 18 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Real Estate Agency may adopt rules and take any other action before the oper-
ative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the  agency
to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section, all the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the agency by the amendments to ORS  696.010,
696.020, 696.022, 696.026, 696.030,  696.125, 696.130, 696.174, 696.241, 696.270, 696.280, 696.294,
696.301, 696.310, 696.320, 696.365 and 696.710 by sections 1 to 18 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 20. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House April 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 30, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2373 (HB 2373-A) Page 19